Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1727
County roads; detachment from county road system.

Whenever a county road has been designated and established as provided by sections 39-2001 to 39-2003, the county board may detach the same, or any part thereof, from the county road system, and cause the same to revert back as a township road. The county board shall no longer be obliged to maintain the same and the maintenance and improvement of the road shall thereafter devolve upon the township.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 27, p. 550.